INDEXER_files_2.8/FUZZY/ru.aff
SFX S Y 40
SFX S   ый   ы            [^н]ый
SFX S   ый   о            [^н]ый
SFX S   ый   а            [^н]ый
SFX S   ый   0            [^н]ый
SFX S   ьный ен           ьный
SFX S   ький ек           ький
SFX S   ой   ы            [^гх]ой
SFX S   ой   о            ой
SFX S   ой   и            [гх]ой
SFX S   ой   а            ой
SFX S   ой   0            ой
SFX S   ный  ы            нный
SFX S   ный  ы            [^ё]нный
SFX S   ный  он           лный
SFX S   ный  о            нный
SFX S   ный  о            [^ё]нный
SFX S   ный  ны           [^н]ный
SFX S   ный  но           [^н]ный
SFX S   ный  на           [^н]ный
SFX S   ный  н            еный
SFX S   ный  н            [ёе]ный
SFX S   ный  ен           [^ейлнь]ный
SFX S   ный  ен           [^ёейлнь]ный
SFX S   ный  а            нный
SFX S   ный  а            [^ё]нный
SFX S   нный н            нный
SFX S   кий  ок           [^аеийоуьы]кий
SFX S   кий  ок           [^ёаеийоуьы]кий
SFX S   кий  к            [аеиоуы]кий
SFX S   кий  к            [ёаеиоуы]кий
SFX S   йный ен           йный
SFX S   йкий ек           йкий
SFX S   ий   о            [гхк]ий
SFX S   ий   и            [гхкжщч]ий
SFX S   ий   е            [жщч]ий
SFX S   ий   а            [гхкжщч]ий
SFX S   ий   0            [гхжщч]ий
SFX S   ённый ены          ённый
SFX S   ённый ено          ённый
SFX S   ённый ена          ённый

SFX R Y 4
SFX R   ться вшись        [аеиояуы]ться
SFX R   ть   в            [аеиояуы]ть
SFX R   сться вшись        сться
SFX R   сть  в            сть

SFX Q Y 6
SFX Q   оваться уясь         оваться
SFX Q   овать уя           овать
SFX Q   еваться уясь         [цжшщч]еваться
SFX Q   еваться юясь         [^цжшщч]еваться
SFX Q   евать уя           [цжшщч]евать
SFX Q   евать юя           [^цжшщч]евать

SFX P Y 12
SFX P   ыться оясь         ыться
SFX P   ыть  оя           ыть
SFX P   ться сь           [аеоу]яться
SFX P   ться ясь          [ае]ться
SFX P   ться ясь          [^аеоу]яться
SFX P   ть   я            [ае]ть
SFX P   ть   я            [^аеоу]ять
SFX P   ять  я            [аеоу]ять
SFX P   иться ясь          [^жшщч]иться
SFX P   иться ась          [жшщч]иться
SFX P   ить  я            [^жшщч]ить
SFX P   ить  а            [жшщч]ить

SFX O Y 131
SFX O   ы    ами          ы
SFX O   ы    ам           ы
SFX O   ы    ах           ы
SFX O   рин  р            рин
SFX O   оть  тями         оть
SFX O   оть  тям          оть
SFX O   оть  тях          оть
SFX O   оть  тя           оть
SFX O   оть  ти           оть
SFX O   оть  тем          оть
SFX O   оть  тей          оть
SFX O   оть  те           оть
SFX O   оть  тю           оть
SFX O   ок   ку           ок
SFX O   ок   ков          ок
SFX O   ок   ком          ок
SFX O   ок   ки           ок
SFX O   ок   ке           ок
SFX O   ок   ками         ок
SFX O   ок   кам          ок
SFX O   ок   ках          ок
SFX O   ок   ка           ок
SFX O   нин  н            нин
SFX O   ин   ы            рин
SFX O   ин   е            нин
SFX O   ин   ами          ин
SFX O   ин   ам           ин
SFX O   ин   ах           ин
SFX O   ий   ья           ий
SFX O   ий   ьими         ий
SFX O   ий   ьим          ий
SFX O   ий   ьих          ий
SFX O   ий   ьи           ий
SFX O   ий   ьему         ий
SFX O   ий   ьем          ий
SFX O   ий   ьей          ий
SFX O   ий   ьего         ий
SFX O   ий   ье           ий
SFX O   ий   ью           ий
SFX O   и    ями          [арс]ти
SFX O   и    ями          [абеилнорсь]и
SFX O   и    ям           [абдеилнорсть]и
SFX O   и    ях           [абдеилнорсть]и
SFX O   и    ами          [^абдеилнорсть]и
SFX O   и    ам           [^абдеилнорсть]и
SFX O   и    ах           [^абдеилнорсть]и
SFX O   ень  нями         ень
SFX O   ень  ням          ень
SFX O   ень  нях          ень
SFX O   ень  ня           ень
SFX O   ень  ни           ень
SFX O   ень  нем          ень
SFX O   ень  ней          ень
SFX O   ень  не           ень
SFX O   ень  ню           ень
SFX O   ел   лы           ел
SFX O   ел   лу           ел
SFX O   ел   лов          ел
SFX O   ел   лом          ел
SFX O   ел   ле           ел
SFX O   ел   лами         ел
SFX O   ел   лам          ел
SFX O   ел   лах          ел
SFX O   ел   ла           ел
SFX O   ек   ьку          [лнрс]ек
SFX O   ек   ьков         [лнрс]ек
SFX O   ек   ьком         [лнрс]ек
SFX O   ек   ьки          [лнрс]ек
SFX O   ек   ьке          [лнрс]ек
SFX O   ек   ьками        [лнрс]ек
SFX O   ек   ькам         [лнрс]ек
SFX O   ек   ьках         [лнрс]ек
SFX O   ек   ька          [лнрс]ек
SFX O   ек   ку           [жшч]ек
SFX O   ек   ков          [жшч]ек
SFX O   ек   ком          [жшч]ек
SFX O   ек   ки           [жшч]ек
SFX O   ек   ке           [жшч]ек
SFX O   ек   ками         [жшч]ек
SFX O   ек   кам          [жшч]ек
SFX O   ек   ках          [жшч]ек
SFX O   ек   ка           [жшч]ек
SFX O   ец   ьцы          лец
SFX O   ец   ьцу          лец
SFX O   ец   ьце          лец
SFX O   ец   ьцами        лец
SFX O   ец   ьцам         лец
SFX O   ец   ьцах         лец
SFX O   ец   ьца          лец
SFX O   ец   йцы          [аеио]ец
SFX O   ец   йцу          [аеио]ец
SFX O   ец   йцев         [аеи]ец
SFX O   ец   йцем         [аеи]ец
SFX O   ец   йце          [аеио]ец
SFX O   ец   йцами        [аеио]ец
SFX O   ец   йцам         [аеио]ец
SFX O   ец   йцах         [аеио]ец
SFX O   ец   йца          [аеио]ец
SFX O   ец   цы           [^аеило]ец
SFX O   ец   цу           [^аеило]ец
SFX O   ец   це           [^аеило]ец
SFX O   ец   цами         [^аеило]ец
SFX O   ец   цам          [^аеило]ец
SFX O   ец   цах          [^аеило]ец
SFX O   ец   ца           [^аеило]ец
SFX O   ёл   лы           ёл
SFX O   ёл   лу           ёл
SFX O   ёл   лов          ёл
SFX O   ёл   лом          ёл
SFX O   ёл   ле           ёл
SFX O   ёл   лами         ёл
SFX O   ёл   лам          ёл
SFX O   ёл   лах          ёл
SFX O   ёл   ла           ёл
SFX O   ёк   ьку          [лнрс]ёк
SFX O   ёк   ьков         [лнрс]ёк
SFX O   ёк   ьком         [лнрс]ёк
SFX O   ёк   ьки          [лнрс]ёк
SFX O   ёк   ьке          [лнрс]ёк
SFX O   ёк   ьками        [лнрс]ёк
SFX O   ёк   ькам         [лнрс]ёк
SFX O   ёк   ьках         [лнрс]ёк
SFX O   ёк   ька          [лнрс]ёк
SFX O   0    у            ин
SFX O   0    ом           ин
SFX O   0    ми           [ая]
SFX O   0    м            [ая]
SFX O   0    х            [ая]
SFX O   0    ев           [аняр]ц
SFX O   0    е            ин
SFX O   0    а            ин

SFX N Y 17
SFX N   ь    ями          [^жшщч]ь
SFX N   ь    ям           [^жшщч]ь
SFX N   ь    ях           [^жшщч]ь
SFX N   ь    и            ь
SFX N   ь    ей           ь
SFX N   ь    ами          [жшщч]ь
SFX N   ь    ам           [жшщч]ь
SFX N   ь    ах           [жшщч]ь
SFX N   0    у            [^ь]
SFX N   0    ов           [^цжьшщч]
SFX N   0    ом           [^цжьшщч]
SFX N   0    е            [^ь]
SFX N   0    ами          [^ь]
SFX N   0    ам           [^ь]
SFX N   0    ах           [^ь]
SFX N   0    а            [^ь]
SFX N   0    ю            ь
